Utah statutes.
7-1-403.   Funds and balances paid to treasurer -- Separate account -- Use of funds.

Unexpended balances and all funds accruing to the department shall be deposited by the commissioner with the state treasurer monthly and constitute a separate account within the General Fund.  No part of the account may revert to the General Fund except an amount as required by law to be transferred for general government and administrative costs.  With the approval of the director of the Division of Finance, the commissioner may withdraw sums from the account to pay costs and expenses of administration incurred in proceedings under Title 7, Chapters 1, 2, and 19, or to use in connection with the rehabilitation, reorganization, or liquidation of an institution under the jurisdiction of the department.



Amended by Chapter 1, 1986 Special Session 4

